Utah statutes.
31A-26-203.   Adjuster's license required.

(1)  The commissioner shall issue a license to act as an independent adjuster or public adjuster to a person who, as to the license classification applied for under Section 31A-26-204:

(a)  satisfies the character requirements under Section 31A-26-205;

(b)  satisfies the applicable continuing education requirements under Section 31A-26-206;

(c)  satisfies the applicable examination requirements under Section 31A-26-207;

(d)  has not committed an act that is a ground for denial, suspension, or revocation provided for in Section 31A-26-213;

(e)  if a nonresident, complies with Section 31A-26-208; and

(f)  pays the applicable fees under Section 31A-3-103.

(2) (a)  This Subsection (2) applies to the following persons:

(i)  an applicant for:

(A)  an independent adjuster's license; or

(B)  a public adjuster's license;

(ii)  a licensed independent adjuster; or

(iii)  a licensed public adjuster.

(b)  A person described in Subsection (2)(a) shall report to the commissioner:

(i)  an administrative action taken against the person:

(A)  in another jurisdiction; or

(B)  by another regulatory agency in this state; and

(ii)  a criminal prosecution taken against the person in any jurisdiction.

(c)  The report required by Subsection (2)(b) shall:

(i)  be filed:

(A)  at the time the person applies for an adjustor's license; and

(B)  if an action or prosecution occurs on or after the day on which the person applies for an adjustor's license:

(I)  for an administrative action, within 30 days of the final disposition of the administrative action; or

(II)  for a criminal prosecution, within 30 days of the initial appearance before a court; and

(ii)  include a copy of the complaint or other relevant legal documents related to the action or prosecution described in Subsection (2)(b).

(3) (a)  The department may require a person applying for a license or for consent to engage in the business of insurance to submit to a criminal background check as a condition of receiving a license or consent.

(b)  A person, if required to submit to a criminal background check under Subsection (3)(a), shall:

(i)  submit a fingerprint card in a form acceptable to the department; and

(ii)  consent to a fingerprint background check by:

(A)  the Utah Bureau of Criminal Identification; and

(B)  the Federal Bureau of Investigation.

(c)  For a person who submits a fingerprint card and consents to a fingerprint background check under Subsection (3)(b), the department may request concerning a person applying for an independent or public adjuster's license:

(i)  criminal background information maintained pursuant to Title 53, Chapter 10, Part 2, Bureau of Criminal Identification, from the Bureau of Criminal Identification; and

(ii)  complete Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal background checks through the national criminal history system.

(d)  Information obtained by the department from the review of criminal history records received under this Subsection (3) shall be used by the department for the purposes of:

(i)  determining if a person satisfies the character requirements under Section 31A-26-205 for issuance or renewal of a license;

(ii)  determining if a person has failed to maintain the character requirements under Section 31A-26-205; and

(iii)  preventing a person who violates the federal Violent Crime Control and Law Enforcement Act of 1994, 18 U.S.C. Secs. 1033 and 1034, from engaging in the business of insurance in the state.

(e)  If the department requests the criminal background information, the department shall:

(i)  pay to the Department of Public Safety the costs incurred by the Department of Public Safety in providing the department criminal background information under Subsection (3)(c)(i);

(ii)  pay to the Federal Bureau of Investigation the costs incurred by the Federal Bureau of Investigation in providing the department criminal background information under Subsection (3)(c)(ii); and

(iii)  charge the person applying for a license or for consent to engage in the business of insurance a fee equal to the aggregate of Subsections (3)(e)(i) and (ii).

(4)  The commissioner may deny a license application to act as an independent adjuster or public adjuster to a person who, as to the license classification applied for under Section 31A-26-204:

(a)  fails to satisfy the requirements in this section; or

(b)  commits an act that is a ground for denial, suspension, or revocation provided for in Section 31A-26-213.

(5)  Notwithstanding the other provisions of this section, the commissioner may:

(a)  issue a license to an applicant for a license for a title insurance classification only with the concurrence of the Title and Escrow Commission; or

(b)  renew a license for a title insurance classification only with the concurrence of the Title and Escrow Commission.

